Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.048

Employer's contribution—Computation—Billing.

(1) The director shall report to each employer the contribution rates required for the ensuing biennium or fiscal year, whichever is applicable.

(2) Beginning September 1, 1990, the amount to be collected as the employer's contribution shall be computed by applying the applicable rates established in chapter 41.45 RCW to the total compensation earnable of employer's members as shown on the current payrolls of the said employer. In addition, the director shall determine and collect the additional employer contribution rate necessary to fund the benefits granted officials holding office pursuant to Articles II and III of the Constitution of the state of Washington and RCW 48.02.010. Each said employer shall compute at the end of each month the amount due for that month and the same shall be paid as are its other obligations. Effective January 1, 1987, however, no contributions are required for any calendar month in which the member is not granted service credit.

(3) In the event of failure, for any reason, of an employer other than a political subdivision of the state to have remitted amounts due for membership service of any of the employer's members rendered during a prior biennium, the director shall bill such employer for such employer's contribution together with such charges as the director deems appropriate in accordance with RCW 41.50.120. Such billing shall be paid by the employer as, and the same shall be, a proper charge against any moneys available or appropriated to such employer for payment of current biennial payrolls.

[ 1989 c 273 s 23; 1986 c 268 s 5; 1985 c 138 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 22; 1979 c 151 s 63; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 20; 1963 c 126 s 1; 1961 c 291 s 12; 1949 c 240 s 26; 1947 c 274 s 38; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11072-38. Formerly RCW 41.40.370.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.